Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1496XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 208 Section 1. Section 216.2, subsection 17, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. âSexual orientationâ means actual or perceived 3 heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality. âSexual 4 orientationâ does not include pedophilia or an adultâs sexual 5 attraction to minors. 6